en: Watermelon sorbet tubs
sv: Vattenmelonsorbetbyttor

en: Multifruit sorbets
da: Multifrugtsorbeter
es: Sorbetes multifruta
fr: Sorbets multifruits
hr: Sorbeti od više voća
lt: Įvairių vaisių šerbetai
nl: Multifruit sorbets
sv: Sorbeter med flera frukter

en: Mango and passion fruit sorbets
da: Mango- og passionsfrugtsorbeter
sv: Mango- och passionfruktsorbeter

en: Artificially sweetened sorbets
fr: Sorbets édulcorés
hr: Umjetno zaslađeni sorbeti
lt: Šerbetai su dirbtiniais saldikliais

en: Plant-based ice creams, Non-dairy ice creams, Vegan ice creams
de: Pflanzliche Eiscremes, Milchfreie Eiscremes
es: Helados con leche vegetal, Helados con bebida vegetal, Helados vegetales
fi: kasvispohjaiset jäätelöt
fr: Crèmes glacées végétales, glaces végétales, Crème glacée à base de plante
hr: Sladoledi na biljnoj bazi
it: Gelati di origine vegetale
lt: Augaliniai ledai, ledai be pieno
nl: Plantaardig IJs

en: Plant-based ice cream bars, Plant-based ice creams on a stick
es: Polos con leche vegetal, Helados de palo con leche vegetal
fr: Barre glacées végétales
hr: Pločice sladoleda na biljnoj bazi
it: Barrette al gelato a base vegetale
lt: Augaliniai ledai ant pagaliuko
nl: Plantaardige ijsjes

es: Polos de leche de soja con chocolate, Helados de palo de leche de soja con chocolate
nl: Plantaardige choco-soja-ijsjes

es: Polos de leche de soja recubiertos con chocolate, Helados de palo de leche de soja recubiertos con chocolate
nl: Plantaardige soja-ijsjes met chocolaag

en: Plant-based ice cream tubs
es: Tarrinas y bloques de helado con leche vegetal, Tarrinas de helado con leche vegetal, Bloques de helado con leche vegetal
fi: Kasvipohjaiset jäätelöpurkit
fr: Crèmes glacées végétales en pot
hr: Kadice za sladoled na biljnoj bazi
lt: Augaliniai ledai indeliuose
nl: Plantaardig roomijs

en: Plant-based ice cream cones
es: Conos de helado con leche vegetal
fi: Kasvipohjaiset jäätelötuutit
fr: Cônes glacés végétaux
hr: Korneti sladoleda na biljnoj bazi
lt: Augaliniai ledai vafliniame ragelyje
nl: Plantaardige ijshoorntjes

en: Plant-based ice cream sandwiches
es: Sándwiches de helado con leche vegetal
fr: Sandwiches à la crème glacée végétale
hr: Sladoledni sendviči na biljnoj bazi
it: Tramezzini al gelato a base vegetale
nl: Plantaardige ijswafels

en: Soy-based ice creams, Soy ice creams
sv: Sojaglasser

en: Chocolate soy ice creams
sv: Kakaosojaglasser

en: Strawberry soy ice creams
sv: Jordgubbssojaglasser

en: Vanilla soy ice creams
sv: Vaniljsojaglasser

en: Ice pops, Popsicle, Freeze pop, Ice lolly, Ice block, Icy pole, Freezer pop
de: Wassereis
es: Helados de hielo, Helados de agua, Polos de hielo, Polos de agua, Paletas de hielo, Paletas de agua
fi: mehujäät
fr: Glaces à l'eau
hr: Led puca
it: Ghiaccioli
ja: アイスキャンディー, アイスバー
nl: Waterijsjes, Waterijs, IJslollies

en: Frozen yogurts, Frozen yoghurts, Frozen yogurt
bg: Замразено кисело мляко
de: Gefrorener Joghurt
es: Yogures helados, Yogures congelados
fi: Jogurttijäätelöt
fr: Yaourts glacés, Glaces au yaourt
hr: Smrznuti jogurti
it: Yogurt gelato, Frozen yogurt
ja: フローズンヨーグルト
lt: Šaldytas jogurtas
nl: Yoghurtijs

en: Granizados
es: Granizados
fr: Granizados
hr: Granizados

es: Granizados de limón
fr: Slush au citron

en: Frozen ravioli
de: Tiefkühlravioli, Tiefgekühlte Ravioli
es: Ravioli congelado
fi: pakastettu ravioli
fr: Ravioli surgelés, raviolis surgelés
hr: Smrznuti ravioli
hu: Fagyasztott ravioli
it: Ravioli surgelati
lt: Šaldyti ravioliai
nl: Diepvriesraviolis, Bevroren ravioli